Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201446-1119
Emergency permit;
application; fee; violation; penalty.

(1) A person
may file an application with the district for an emergency permit on forms
provided by the district. The district shall review each emergency application
and approve or deny the application within two working
days after the application is filed. An emergency application
shall be approved and a permit issued by the district if the irrigation distribution
system complies with the equipment requirements of section 46-1127 and the
applicator has been certified under sections 46-1128 and 46-1129. If the district
has not denied an emergency permit within two working
days, it shall be deemed approved. Such permit shall be valid
for a period of forty-five days from the date of issuance.

(2)
The application for an emergency permit shall be accompanied by a fee as established
in 46-1121 not to exceed five hundred dollars payable to the district. For
each permit, ten dollars shall be paid by the district to the department.
The application shall contain the same information as required in section
46-1120.

(3) Any holder of an emergency
permit or an applicator applying chemicals pursuant thereto who violates any
of the provisions of this section shall have such permit automatically revoked
without a hearing and shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB272, § 4.
July 18, 2014